Mississippi, session 2026, HB1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Legislature finds that the state song, "One Mississippi," is an important cultural and historical representation of the State of Mississippi. The dissemination and instruction of the book, One Mississippi, which provides context and history about the state song, will promote an understanding of Mississippi's heritage among students and support the development of civic pride. SECTION 2. (1)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the State Department of Education, subject to appropriation for such purposes, shall acquire sufficient copies of the book, One Mississippi, to distribute to all public school districts and charter schools in the state, which such schools shall receive enough copies to provide every student enrolled in Grade 2 with an individual copy of the book.  The schools shall make inventory of the total quantity of books received and shall require the parents or legal guardians of student to purchase the book, as a component of the student's necessary instruction, at cost without recouping any pecuniary benefit from such sales. (2)  The instruction shall be administered annually during the national "Read Across America Week" observance.  School districts and charter schools shall ensure that teachers adhere to the lesson plan template when teaching the material. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.